Delaware, session 153, HB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 504B, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 504B. Open meetings. (c) A method for the public to remotely attend and provide public comment at school board meetings must be provided. Section 2. Amend Â§ 1048, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1048. Regular and special meetings; quorum; roll call vote. (f) A method for the public to remotely attend and provide public comment at school board meetings must be provided.